Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.250

Local improvement districts and utility local improvement districts—Notice of filing roll—Hearing on protests.

Before the approval of the roll a notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in a newspaper of general circulation in the local district, stating that the roll is on file and open to inspection in the office of the county legislative authority, and fixing the time, not less than fifteen or more than forty-five days from the date of the first publication of the notice, within which protests must be filed with the clerk against any assessments shown thereon, and fixing a time when a hearing will be held on the protests. The hearing shall be held before the county legislative authority, or the county legislative authority may direct that the hearing shall be held before either a committee of the legislative authority or a designated officer. The notice shall also be given by mailing at least fifteen days before the hearing, a similar notice to the owners or reputed owners of the land in the local district as they appear on the books of the treasurer of the county.

[ 1981 c 313 s 17; 1967 c 72 s 25.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 313: See note following RCW 36.94.020.